Maine, session 132, LD599.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 26 MRSA §663, sub-§3, ¶K, as amended by PL 2009, c. 529, §2, is further
amended to read:
K. A salaried employee who works in a bona fide executive, administrative or
professional capacity and whose regular compensation, when converted to an annual
rate, exceeds 3000 times the State's minimum hourly wage or the annualized rate
established by the United States Department of Labor under the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act, whichever is higher; and the highest of:
(1) Three thousand times the State’s minimum hourly wage as determined in
section 664, subsection 1;
(2) A salary level of $58,656 per year;
(3) The 35th percentile of weekly earnings for full-time salary workers in the
lowest-wage census region as published by the United States Department of Labor,
Bureau of Labor Statistics, or its successor agency, as of July 1, 2027, and
calculated every 3 years thereafter; and
(4) The annualized rate established by the United States Department of Labor
under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act; and